Maryland, session 2025, SB0848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–147.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(B) (1) ANY PREMIUM FUNDS COLLECTED BY AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO
THIS SECTION FOR ABORTION COVERAGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1303(B)(2)(B)
AND (C) OF THE FEDERAL PATIENT PROTECTION AND AFFORDABLE CARE ACT
SHALL BE USED:
(I) TO PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR ABORTION CARE CLINICAL
SERVICES FOR INSUREDS OR ENROLLEES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–857 OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) IF AFTER THE 12–MONTH PERIOD FOLLOWING THE END OF A PLAN
YEAR THE AMOUNT OF THE ENDING BALANCE OF A SEGREGATED ACCOUNT
ESTABLISHED FOR COVERAGE OF ABORTION CARE CLINICAL SERVICES EXCEEDS
DISBURSEMENTS, 90% OF THE ENDING BALANCE SHALL BE USED TO SUPPORT
COVERAGE OF ABORTION CARE CLINICAL SERVICES FOR WHICH THE USE OF
FEDERAL FUNDS IS PROHIBITED.
(C) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 EACH YEAR, AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS
SECTION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSIONER AN ACCOUNTING OF RECEIPTS,
DISBURSEMENTS, ACCRUED INTEREST, AND THE YEAR–END BALANCE FOR
SEGREGATED ACCOUNTS ESTABLISHED BY THE ENTITY UNDER § 1303(B)(2)(B) AND
(C) OF THE FEDERAL PATIENT PROTECTION AND AFFORDABLE CARE ACT:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 436
(1) ON A FORM APPROVED BY THE COMMISSIONER; AND
(2) WITH ANY RELATED DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED BY THE
COMMISSIONER.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMMISSIONER SHALL ORDER THE TRANSFER OF FUNDS FROM EACH ENTITY’S
SEGREGATED ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED BY THE ENTITY FOR COVERAGE OF ABORTION
CARE CLINICAL SERVICES TO THE PUBLIC HEALTH ABORTION GRANT PROGRAM
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 13–5503 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE IN THE
FOLLOWING AMOUNTS:
(I) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, 90% OF THE AMOUNT
OF THE ENDING BALANCE OF THE SEGREGATED ACCOUNT THAT EXCEEDS
DISBURSEMENTS FOR EACH OF PLAN YEARS 2014 THROUGH 2023; AND
(II) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026,
90% OF THE AMOUNT OF THE ENDING BALANCE OF A SEGREGATED ACCOUNT THAT
EXCEEDS DISBURSEMENTS AFTER THE 15–MONTH PERIOD FOLLOWING THE END OF
A PLAN YEAR.
(2) (I) THE AMOUNT ORDERED TO BE TRANSFERRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE AMOUNT OF INTEREST
ACCRUED TO THE SEGREGATED ACCOUNT AS OF DECEMBER 31, 2025 2024.
(II) THE AMOUNT ORDERED TO BE TRANSFERRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE AMOUNT OF
INTEREST ACCRUED TO THE SEGREGATED ACCOUNT AS OF DECEMBER 31 OF THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(E) A PARTY AGGRIEVED BY AN ORDER OF THE COMMISSIONER UNDER THIS
SECTION HAS THE RIGHT TO A HEARING AND THE RIGHT TO APPEAL FROM THE
ORDER OF THE COMMISSIONER UNDER §§ 2–210 THROUGH 2–215 OF THIS ARTICLE.
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 55. PUBLIC HEALTH ABORTION GRANT PROGRAM.
13–5501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT:
– 3 –

Ch. 436 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) (I) 1. IS OWNED BY OR EMPLOYS HEALTH CARE
PRACTITIONERS WHO ARE AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE UNDER THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; AND
2. PROVIDES EQUITABLE ACCESS TO ABORTION CARE
CLINICAL SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITHOUT SUFFICIENT RESOURCES; OR
(II) ADMINISTERS A FUND TO PROVIDE EQUITABLE ACCESS TO
ABORTION CARE CLINICAL SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITHOUT SUFFICIENT
RESOURCES;
(2) IS IN GOOD STANDING IN THE STATE OR JURISDICTION IN WHICH
THE ORGANIZATION IS REGISTERED OR INCORPORATED; AND
(3) HAS POLICIES THAT DO NOT RESTRICT ACCESS TO ABORTION
CARE AND ARE CONSISTENT WITH TITLE 20, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE PUBLIC HEALTH ABORTION GRANT PROGRAM
FUND.
(D) “INDIVIDUALS WITHOUT SUFFICIENT RESOURCES” MEANS INDIVIDUALS
WHO ARE:
(1) UNINSURED;
(2) UNDERINSURED, WITHOUT SUFFICIENT ABORTION COVERAGE;
OR
(3) UNABLE TO USE THEIR INSURANCE DUE TO THE RISKS POSED BY
COMMUNICATION FROM INSURANCE CARRIERS REGARDING COVERAGE.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE PUBLIC HEALTH ABORTION GRANT
PROGRAM.
13–5502.
(A) THERE IS A PUBLIC HEALTH ABORTION GRANT PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO IMPROVE
ACCESS TO ABORTION CARE CLINICAL SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 436
(C) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE OPERATING GRANTS TO
ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATIONS TO SUPPORT EQUITABLE ACCESS TO ABORTION CARE
CLINICAL SERVICES ACROSS THE STATE.
(2) GRANT FUNDS PROVIDED UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL BE USED
TO SUPPORT ABORTION CARE CLINICAL SERVICES FOR WHICH FEDERAL FUNDING
IS PROHIBITED FOR INDIVIDUALS WITHOUT SUFFICIENT RESOURCES, INCLUDING
TO COVER REASONABLE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF MANAGING SERVICES
PROVIDED UNDER THE GRANT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD AT LEAST 90% OF THE FUNDS
APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAM AS GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATIONS.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT:
(1) RELEASE, PUBLISH, OR OTHERWISE DISCLOSE ANY IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION FOR:
(I) THE STAFF OF AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION THAT APPLIES
FOR OR RECEIVES A GRANT OR REIMBURSEMENT FROM GRANT FUNDING UNDER
THE PROGRAM; OR
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER OR STAFF
WHO PROVIDES ABORTION CARE CLINICAL SERVICES FOR AN ELIGIBLE
ORGANIZATION THAT RECEIVES A GRANT OR REIMBURSEMENT FROM GRANT
FUNDING UNDER THE PROGRAM; OR
(2) COLLECT IDENTIFYING INFORMATION FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO
REQUEST OR OBTAIN SUPPORT FOR ABORTION CARE CLINICAL SERVICES FROM AN
ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION AWARDED A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT:
(1) RESTRICT THE USE OF FUNDS GRANTED UNDER THE PROGRAM IN
A MANNER THAT IS INCONSISTENT WITH TITLE 20, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(2) ALLOW AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION THAT IS AWARDED A GRANT
UNDER THE PROGRAM TO RESTRICT THE USE OF FUNDS IN A MANNER THAT IS
INCONSISTENT WITH TITLE 20, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP STANDARDS FOR THE GRANTS TO
ENSURE FUNDS ARE BEING USED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION.
– 5 –

Ch. 436 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
13–5503.
(A) THERE IS A PUBLIC HEALTH ABORTION GRANT PROGRAM FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS UNDER THE
PROGRAM.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND UNDER § 15–147 OF THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE PROGRAM.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, THE GOVERNOR SHALL ALLOCATE TO
THE PROGRAM BY BUDGET AMENDMENT $2,000,000 IN FUNDING AS REQUIRED TO
BE TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND UNDER § 15–147(D)(1)(I) OF THE INSURANCE
ARTICLE.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 436
(J) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN
THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION FOR THE FUND THAT IS AT LEAST
EQUAL TO THE FUNDING REQUIRED TO BE TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND UNDER §
15–147(D)(1)(II) OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE PUBLIC HEALTH ABORTION GRANT PROGRAM
FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) If, on or before June 30, 2031, the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
advises the Maryland Insurance Administration that the provisions of Section 1 of this Act
violate § 1303 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Section 1 of this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
(b) The Maryland Insurance Administration shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services within 5 days after receiving notice that Section 1 of this Act violates
§ 1303 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 7 –